Tennessee, session 114, HB1291.
BE IT ENACTED BY THE GENERAL ASSEMBLY OF THE STATE OF TENNESSEE:
SECTION 1. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-7-2360, is amended by deleting
subdivisions (a)(1)(E) and (F) and substituting:
(E) "Health benefit plan":
(i) Means a hospital or medical expense policy; health, hospital, or
medical service corporation contract; a policy or agreement entered into by a
health insurer or a health maintenance organization contract offered by an
employer; other plans administered by the state government; or a certificate
issued under the policies, contracts, or plans; and
(ii) Includes a plan of coverage under TennCare or a successor program
provided for pursuant to title 71, chapter 5;
(F) "Health insurance carrier":
(i) Means an entity subject to this title, or subject to the jurisdiction of the
commissioner of commerce and insurance, that contracts with healthcare
providers in connection with a plan of health insurance, health benefits, or health
services; and
(ii) Includes a vendor, as defined in § 71-5-103, or an entity that provides
a health benefit plan of coverage under TennCare or a successor program
provided for pursuant to title 71, chapter 5;
HB1291
003228
- 1 -

SECTION 2. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-7-2360(b), is amended by
deleting "provided, that for purposes of a TennCare health benefit plan, additional criteria used
must ensure that benefit determination, including coverage and reimbursement for the treatment
of alcoholism or drug dependence, remain in parity with benefit determination for the treatment
of mental health disorders." and substituting "provided, further, that additional criteria used must
ensure that benefit determination, including coverage for the treatment of alcoholism or drug
dependence, remain in parity with benefit determination for the treatment of mental health
disorders.".
SECTION 3. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-7-2360(c), is amended by
deleting the subsection and substituting:
(c) Notwithstanding another law to the contrary, a health benefit plan issued by a
health insurance carrier must provide coverage for mental health services and treatment
to the same extent that the health benefit plan provides coverage for the treatment of
alcoholism and drug dependence.
SECTION 4. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-7-2360(e)(4)(E), is amended by
deleting the subdivision and substituting:
(E) A detailed explanation regarding parity in coverage and rates of
reimbursement for mental health services and alcoholism and drug dependency services
in compliance with § 56-7-2360(c);
SECTION 5. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-7-2601(e), is amended by adding
the following as a new subdivision:
(4) A residential or other mental health treatment facility licensed under title 33,
chapter 2, part 4.
SECTION 6. Tennessee Code Annotated, Section 56-7-2601(g)(5), is amended by
deleting the semicolon at the end of the subdivision and substituting "; provided, that coverage
- 2 - 003228

for mental health treatment must remain in parity with coverage for alcoholism and drug
dependence coverage;".
SECTION 7. This act takes effect July 1, 2025, the public welfare requiring it, and
applies to policies, plans, and contracts entered into, renewed, amended, or modified on or after
that date.
- 3 - 003228